apertium-en-af/apertium-en-af.af.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ÄÊËÖÜäêëöüßABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser" c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux" c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past" c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres" c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/>

    <sdef n="aff" c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg" c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers" c="Impersonal"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn" c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint" c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="attr" c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred" c="Predicative"/>

    <sdef n="detnt" c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj" c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj" c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pro" c="Proclitic"/>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="loc" c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="ant" c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="al" c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn" c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an" c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa" c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="pp" c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Pretério perfecto o indefinido"/>
    <sdef n="pii" c="Pretério imperfecto de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis" c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom" c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="sent" c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>    
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numbers -->

    <pardef n="een__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="twee__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="en__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="want__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="met__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Articles -->

    <pardef n="die__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="'n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Other determiners -->

    <pardef n="ander__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="baie__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="elke__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tweede__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>

    <pardef n="verskeie__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="myne__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hierdie__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="miskien__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="waar__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoe__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="itg"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Preadverbs -->

    <e lm="die"><i>die</i><par n="die__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'n"><i>'n</i><par n="'n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ander"><i>ander</i><par n="ander__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sommige"><i>sommige</i><par n="baie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="elke"><i>elke</i><par n="elke__det"/></e>
    <e lm="baie"><i>baie</i><par n="baie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="verskeie"><i>verskeie</i><par n="verskeie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tweede"><i>tweede</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="derde"><i>derde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="vierde"><i>vierde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="vyfde"><i>vyfde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sesde"><i>sesde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sewende"><i>sewende</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="agtste"><i>agtste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="agste"><i>agste</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tiende"><i>tiende</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="twaalfde"><i>twaalfde</i><par n="tweede__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hierdie"><i>hierdie</i><par n="hierdie__det"/></e>
    <e lm="myne"><i>myne</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="joune"><i>joune</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="syne"><i>syne</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hare"><i>hare</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ons"><i>ons</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hulle"><i>hulle</i><par n="myne__det"/></e>
    <e lm="by"><i>by</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="met"><i>met</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vir"><i>vir</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="uit"><i>uit</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om te"><i>om<b/>te</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tussen"><i>tussen</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tydens"><i>toe</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="so lyk"><i>so<b/>lyk</i><par n="met__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nietemin"><i>nietemin</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="of"><i>of</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="maar"><i>maar</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="egter"><i>egter</i><par n="en__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="want"><i>want</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="siende dat"><i>siende<b/>dat</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="byvoorbeeld"><i>byvoorbeeld</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="indien"><i>indien</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="terwyl"><i>terwyl</i><par n="want__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="een"><i>een</i><par n="een__num"/></e>
    <e lm="twee"><i>twee</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="drie"><i>drie</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vier"><i>vier</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vyf"><i>vyf</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ses"><i>ses</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sewe"><i>sewe</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="agt"><i>agt</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nege"><i>nege</i><par n="twee__num"/></e>
    <e lm="merendeels"><i>merendeels</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ook"><i>ook</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nou"><i>nou</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eintlik"><i>eintlik</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vandag"><i>vandag</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nog"><i>nog</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eers"><i>eers</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><i>dan</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="daarop"><i>daarop</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="in totaal"><i>in<b/>totaal</i><par n="miskien__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="waar"><i>waar</i><par n="waar__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="hoe"><i>hoe</i><par n="hoe__adv"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- Separators -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/> <!-- Comma -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/> <!-- Apostrophe -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/> <!-- Left parenthensis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/> <!-- Right parenthesis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/> <!-- Hyphen -->
    </e>
